Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1648
Lending agency; subject to defenses and claims.

Notwithstanding the presence or absence of the notation required by section 85-1647 and notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary, the lending agency making such loan or extending such credit and any transferee, assignee, or holder of such evidence of indebtedness shall be subject to all defenses and claims which could be asserted against the private postsecondary career school which was to render or furnish such services or facilities by any party to the evidence of indebtedness or by the person to whom such services or facilities were to be rendered or furnished up to the amount remaining to be paid thereon.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 52;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 47;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2852;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 48.